Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,122.02
Land survey; failure to file record; effect.

Any registered land surveyor who fails to file a record of survey as provided in section 81-8,122.01 shall be reported to the examining board which shall take whatever action, as provided in section 81-8,123, that it deems appropriate.

Laws 1969, c. 764, § 2, p. 2893;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 21.